Mississippi, session 2026, SB2596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation is authorized to transfer to the City of Ridgeland, Mississippi, at no cost certain real property and any improvements thereon located in Ridgeland, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows: Parcel COMMENCING at a found 1" square iron bar representing the Northwest corner of Section 24, Township 7 North, Range 1 East, Madison County, Mississippi, having grid coordinates N= 1,070,881.727, E= 2,350,696.771 based on the Mississippi State Plane Coordinates System, West Zone, NAD83 (93), coordinates and courses herein are grid values based on said coordinate system, using a combined factor of 0.999954143 and a delta alpha angle of plus (+)00°06'17'' as developed by the Mississippi Department of Transportation for this Project; run thence South 44°02'38" East a distance of 6906.45 feet to the Old Agency Road Project Centerline at Station 25+50.68, as shown ·on the Appraisal Maps for Project ACNH-9204-00(001) (100486/201000), and thence South 18°35'37" West a distance of 49.86 feet to the present (2006) Southern right-of-way for the existing Old Agency Road and a found 1/2" iron rod, same being the Grantor's Northwest property corner, and being the Point of Beginning for the parcel of land herein conveyed: From said Point of Beginning run thence along said Southern right-of-way line, same being the Grantor's Northern property line courses of South 71°13 '20" East a distance of 123.92 feet to a point being 47.59 feet Southerly of said Project Centerline at Point of Curve Station 26+75.76, and thence Southeasterly along the arc of a curve to the right with a radius of 832.88 feet, an arc distance of 120.63 feet and a chord bearing South 68°1 I '59" East for a distance of 120.53 feet to the Grantor's Northeast property corner and a found concrete right-of-way marker; thence run South 00°19'42" East along the Grantor's Eastern property line a distance of 467.16 feet to the Grantor's Southeast property corner and a found W' iron rod; thence run North 87°29'05" West along the Grantor's Southern property line a distance of 305.53 feet to the Grantor's Southwest property corner and a found 5/8" iron rod; thence run ·along the Grantor's Western property line courses of North 05°31' 14" East a distance of 419.48 feet to a found W' iron rod, and thence North 15°15'35" East a distance of 125.28 feet to said Point of Beginning, containing 3.2393 acres (141,104 square feet of land, more or less, and being situated in and a part of the Southeast Quarter (SE Y.) of the Southeast Quarter (SE Y.) of Section 24, Township 7 North, Range 1 East, City of Ridgeland, Madison County, Mississippi, and The above described parcel of land being a part of that certain tract of land acquired by Grantor by virtue of that certain Deed recorded in Deed Book 1802 at Page 497 in the Office of the Chancery Clerk for Madison County, Mississippi. (2)  The State of Mississippi shall retain all mineral rights to the real property transferred under this section. (3)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation is authorized to correct any discrepancies in the legal description of the property provided in this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.